Utah statutes.
34-26-3.   Claim -- Exceptions -- Contest.

Any person interested may within 10 days after the notice of presentment of said statement contest such claims, or any part of them, by filing exceptions to them supported by affidavit with the officer or court having the custody of such property, and thereupon the claimant shall be required to reduce his claim to judgment in some court having jurisdiction before any part thereof shall be paid. The person contesting shall be made a party defendant in any such action and shall have the right to contest such claim, and the prevailing party shall recover proper costs.



Enacted by Chapter 85, 1969 General Session

